District of Columbia statutes.
47-3722

Effect of repealers.

(a)

The repeal by this act of any provision of law shall not affect any act done or any right accrued or accruing under the provision of law before April 1, 1987, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced before April 1, 1987, but all rights and liabilities under prior law shall continue and may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as if the repeal had not been made.

(b)

All offenses committed, and all penalties incurred prior to April 1, 1987, under any provision of law repealed, may be prosecuted and punished in the same manner and with the same effect as if this chapter had not been enacted.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 23, 33 DCR 7008
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, §§ 402(e), 403(1), 34 DCR 689
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-3722.
Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 6-209 provided that title III and sections 401, 402, 404, 405 and 406 of the act shall take effect on October 1, 1987.
“This Act,” referred to in subsection (a), is D.C. Law 6-168, codified as § 47-3701 et seq.